Washington statutes.
RCW 9.46.050

Gambling commission—Chair—Quorum—Meetings—Compensation and travel expenses—Bond—Removal.

(1) Upon appointment of the initial membership the commission shall meet at a time and place designated by the governor and proceed to organize, electing one of such members as chair of the commission who shall serve until July 1, 1974; thereafter a chair shall be elected annually.

(2) A majority of the members shall constitute a quorum of the commission: PROVIDED, That all actions of the commission relating to the regulation of licensing under this chapter shall require an affirmative vote by three or more members of the commission.

(3) The principal office of the commission shall be at the state capitol, and meetings shall be held at least quarterly and at such other times as may be called by the chair or upon written request to the chair of a majority of the commission.

(4) Members shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.250 and shall receive reimbursement for travel expenses incurred in the performance of their duties as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(5) Before entering upon the duties of his or her office, each of the members of the commission shall enter into a surety bond executed by a surety company authorized to do business in this state, payable to the state of Washington, to be approved by the governor, in the penal sum of fifty thousand dollars, conditioned upon the faithful performance of his or her duties, and shall take and subscribe to the oath of office prescribed for elective state officers, which oath and bond shall be filed with the secretary of state. The premium for said bond shall be paid by the commission.

(6) Any member of the commission may be removed for inefficiency, malfeasance, or misfeasance in office, upon specific written charges filed by the governor, who shall transmit such written charges to the member accused and to the chief justice of the supreme court. The chief justice shall thereupon designate a tribunal composed of three judges of the superior court to hear and adjudicate the charges. Such tribunal shall fix the time of the hearing, which shall be public, and the procedure for the hearing, and the decision of such tribunal shall be final. Removal of any member of the commission by the tribunal shall disqualify such member for reappointment.

[ 2011 c 336 s 302; 1984 c 287 s 9; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s 7; 1973 1st ex.s. c 218 s 5.]

NOTES:

Legislative findings—Severability—Effective date—1984 c 287: See notes following RCW 43.03.220.

Effective date—Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34: See notes following RCW 2.08.115.